Maryland, session 2026, HB1626.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Agriculture
2–106.
(a) The following positions and units are included within the Department:
(1) The Maryland Agricultural Fair Board;
(2) The Chief of Weights and Measures;
(3) The State Chemist;
(4) The State Veterinarian;
(5) The State Board of Veterinary Medical Examiners;
(6) The State Soil Conservation Committee;
(7) The Maryland Agricultural Commission;
(8) The Maryland Horse Industry Board;
(9) The Maryland Winery and Grape Growers’ Advisory Board;
(10) The Seafood Marketing Advisory Commission; [and]
(11) The State Specialist for Value–Added Agriculture; AND
(12) THE FOOD SECURITY COORDINATION OFFICE.
(b) The Secretary shall appoint the State Chemist, State Veterinarian, State
Specialist for Value–Added Agriculture, and Chief of Weights and Measures.
(c) The Department also includes any other position or unit which is declared
within the Department pursuant to law.
SUBTITLE 25. MARYLAND FOOD SECURITY, ACCESS, AND EQUITY ACT.
2–2501.

HOUSE BILL 1626 3
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “FOOD INSECURITY” MEANS LIMITED OR UNCERTAIN
ACCESS TO ADEQUATE OR NUTRITIOUS FOOD.
2–2502.
THE PURPOSE OF THIS SUBTITLE IS TO STRENGTHEN THE STATE FOOD
SYSTEM BY EXPANDING ACCESS TO HEALTHY FOODS, SUPPORTING LOCAL FARMERS
BY IMPROVING FOOD DISTRIBUTION NETWORKS, AND COORDINATING STATEWIDE
EFFORTS TO ELIMINATE FOOD INSECURITY.
2–2503.
THE FOOD SECURITY COORDINATING OFFICE SHALL ADMINISTER THIS
SUBTITLE AND:
(1) COORDINATE STATEWIDE FOOD ACCESS INITIATIVES;
(2) SUPPORT PARTNERSHIPS BETWEEN LOCAL FARMERS, FOOD
DISTRIBUTORS, AND COMMUNITY ORGANIZATIONS;
(3) MAINTAIN A STATEWIDE DATA DASHBOARD ON FOOD ACCESS AND
FOOD INSECURITY; AND
(4) PROVIDE TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE TO LOCAL JURISDICTIONS TO
ELIMINATE FOOD INSECURITY.
2–2504.
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH A RURAL–TO–URBAN PRODUCE
DISTRIBUTION PROGRAM TO CONNECT LOCAL FARMERS WITH URBAN AND
SUBURBAN COMMUNITIES EXPERIENCING FOOD INSECURITY BY:
(1) CREATING FOOD AGGREGATION AND DISTRIBUTION HUBS;
(2) SUPPORTING THE TRANSPORTATION OF FOOD FROM LOCAL
FARMERS TO URBAN AND SUBURBAN COMMUNITIES;
(3) IMPROVING THE INFRASTRUCTURE IN THE STATE FOR THE FOOD
COLD CHAIN; AND
(4) ESTABLISHING PARTNERSHIPS BETWEEN LOCAL FARMERS, FOOD
BANKS, SCHOOLS, AND COMMUNITY MARKETS.

HOUSE BILL 1626
2–2505.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE” INCLUDES GRANTS, LOW– OR
NO–INTEREST LOANS, OR OTHER ASSISTANCE THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES TO
BE NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
(3) “PROJECT” MEANS:
(I) COLD CHAIN FACILITIES;
(II) TRANSPORTATION FLEETS AND LOGISTICS SYSTEMS;
(III) RURAL AGGREGATION HUBS;
(IV) URBAN AND SUBURBAN DISTRIBUTION CENTERS; AND
(V) TECHNOLOGY PLATFORMS FOR ROUTING, TRACKING, AND
INVENTORY CONTROL.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH THE MARYLAND
RURAL–TO–URBAN PRODUCE FINANCING PROGRAM TO FUND PROJECTS THAT
STABILIZE AND EXPAND THE MOVEMENT OF MARYLAND–GROWN PRODUCE TO
URBAN AND SUBURBAN COMMUNITIES WITH FOOD INSECURITY.
(C) THE MARYLAND RURAL–TO–URBAN PRODUCE FINANCING PROGRAM
SHALL:
(1) PROVIDE LOW– OR NO–INTEREST, PERFORMANCE–BASED
FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE TO SUPPORT PROJECTS THAT IMPACT THE AGGREGATION,
TRANSPORTATION, AND DISTRIBUTION OF PRODUCE GROWN IN THE STATE;
(2) REDUCE FINANCIAL BARRIERS THAT MAY LIMIT THE ABILITY OF
SMALL AND MID–SIZED FARMERS TO PARTICIPATE IN THE RURAL–TO–URBAN AND
SUBURBAN FOOD DISTRIBUTION NETWORKS;
(3) STRENGTHEN THE STATE’S LOCAL FOOD ECONOMY BY
IMPROVING ACCESS TO FRESH, NUTRITIOUS FOOD IN COMMUNITIES THAT ARE FOOD
INSECURE; AND

HOUSE BILL 1626 5
(4) PROVIDE LONG–TERM AND SELF–SUSTAINING INFRASTRUCTURE
THAT SUPPORTS ACCESS TO MARYLAND–GROWN PRODUCE.
(D) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH FINANCIAL MECHANISMS,
INCLUDING BOND ISSUANCE, TO PROVIDE FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE TO:
(I) LOCAL FARMERS AND FARMING COOPERATIVES;
(II) NONPROFIT AND COMMUNITY–BASED ORGANIZATIONS;
(III) FOOD HUBS AND OTHER FOOD DISTRIBUTION NETWORKS;
(IV) LOCAL GOVERNMENTS; AND
(V) SOCIAL–ENTERPRISE ENTITIES THAT ARE ENGAGED IN
INCREASING ACCESS TO FOOD.
(2) TO RECEIVE FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE, AN ENTITY LISTED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL:
(I) DEMONSTRATE A PLAN TO DELIVER MARYLAND–GROWN
PRODUCE TO COMMUNITIES THAT ARE FOOD INSECURE; AND
(II) HAVE THE CAPACITY TO MEET PERFORMANCE METRICS
ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) ESTABLISH PERFORMANCE BENCHMARKS, INCLUDING THOSE
RELATED TO INCREASING ACCESS TO FOOD; AND
(2) PRIORITIZE THE PROVISION OF FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE TO
PROJECTS THAT WILL DIRECTLY INCREASE THE AVAILABILITY OF PRODUCE TO
COMMUNITIES THAT ARE FOOD INSECURE.
(F) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ENTER INTO CONTRACTS WITH LOCAL
FARMERS, FARMING COOPERATIVES, FOOD DISTRIBUTORS, AND OTHER
ORGANIZATIONS AS NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
2–2506.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH A GRANT PROGRAM TO PROVIDE
GRANTS TO ORGANIZATIONS TO:

HOUSE BILL 1626
(1) EXPAND COMMUNITY AND MOBILE MARKETS;
(2) SUPPORT URBAN AGRICULTURE AND COMMUNITY GARDENS; AND
(3) INCREASE ACCESS TO CULTURALLY RELEVANT FOODS.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH:
(1) GRANT APPLICATION PROCEDURES;
(2) GRANT AWARD CRITERIA; AND
(3) GRANT AMOUNTS.
(C) ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, RECIPIENTS OF GRANTS IN
THE PREVIOUS FISCAL YEAR SHALL REPORT TO THE DEPARTMENT ON THE
OUTCOMES OF THE GRANTS AND THEIR IMPACT ON THE RECIPIENTS’ COMMUNITIES.
2–2507.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SUPPORT PARTNERSHIPS BETWEEN HEALTH
CARE PROVIDERS AND ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROMOTE ACCESS TO FOOD THROUGH
PRODUCE PRESCRIPTION PROGRAMS, MEDICALLY TAILORED GROCERIES, AND
NUTRITION EDUCATION.
(B) HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS THAT PARTICIPATE IN A PARTNERSHIP
SHALL TRACK PATIENT HEALTH OUTCOMES AND REPORT THE OUTCOMES TO THE
DEPARTMENT.
2–2508.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ENTER INTO CONTRACTS WITH THIRD PARTIES
TO DEVELOP, IMPLEMENT, AND ADMINISTER THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE,
INCLUDING:
(1) PROGRAM DESIGN AND OPERATIONAL PLANNING;
(2) TECHNOLOGY DEVELOPMENT AND DATA SYSTEMS;
(3) DISTRIBUTION AND COORDINATION LOGISTICS; AND
(4) EVALUATION AND REPORTING FUNCTIONS.

HOUSE BILL 1626 7
(B) A THIRD PARTY CONTRACTED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL:
(1) HAVE DEMONSTRATED EXPERTISE IN FOOD SYSTEMS, LOGISTICS,
AGRICULTURE, OR PROGRAM ADMINISTRATION;
(2) COMPLY WITH STATE PROCUREMENT LAWS UNDER DIVISION II
OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE; AND
(3) HAVE THE CAPABILITY TO MEET PERFORMANCE BENCHMARKS
AND REPORTING REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT MAY AUDIT A THIRD PARTY AWARDED A CONTRACT
UNDER THIS SECTION.
2–2509.
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PUBLISH ANNUALLY ON ITS WEBSITE A STATEWIDE
FOOD SECURITY REPORT THAT INCLUDES:
(1) RATES OF FOOD INSECURITY IN EACH COUNTY;
(2) PARTICIPATION RATES FOR PROGRAMS ESTABLISHED UNDER
THIS SUBTITLE;
(3) METRICS FOR THE DISTRIBUTION OF FOOD AND OTHER
RESOURCES UNDER THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(4) THE IMPACT OF THIS SUBTITLE ON LOCAL FARMERS.
2–2510.
ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT
REGULATIONS NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THIS SUBTITLE.
2–2511.
THIS SUBTITLE SHALL BE REFERRED TO AS THE MARYLAND FOOD SECURITY,
ACCESS, AND EQUITY ACT.
10–1601.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.

HOUSE BILL 1626
(2) “Farm product” means any agricultural, horticultural, vegetable, fruit
product, whether raw, canned, frozen, dried, pickled, or otherwise processed, livestock,
meats, marine food products, poultry, eggs, dairy products, nuts, honey, and every edible
product of farm, orchard, garden, or water.
(3) “Program” means the Jane Lawton Farm–to–School Program.
(4) “SCHOOL” INCLUDES PUBLIC AND PRIVATE PREKINDERGARTEN
PROGRAMS, CHILD CARE FACILITIES, AND EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATION
PROGRAMS.
(b) There is a Jane Lawton Farm–to–School Program in the Department.
(c) The Program is established for the purpose of:
(1) Promoting the sale of farm products grown in the State to Maryland
schools in consultation with the State Department of Education;
(2) Soliciting farmers to sell their farm products to Maryland schools;
(3) Developing and regularly updating a database of farmers interested in
selling their farm products to Maryland schools, including the types and amounts of farm
products the farmers want to sell and the time periods in which the farmers want to sell;
(4) Facilitating purchases from farmers by interested Maryland schools in
consultation with the State Department of Education and in compliance with applicable
procurement requirements; [and]
(5) Providing outreach and guidance to farmers concerning the value of and
procedure for selling their farm products to interested Maryland schools; AND
(6) SUPPORTING SCHOOL GARDENS AND NUTRITION EDUCATION.
(d) (1) The Program, in partnership with the State Department of Education
and in consultation with school food service directors and interested farming organizations,
shall establish promotional events that promote State agriculture and farm products to
children through school meal and classroom programs.
(2) At least one promotional event shall:
(i) Last for a period of 1 week;
(ii) Be known as “Maryland Homegrown School Lunch Week”;
(iii) Promote State agriculture and farm products to children through
school meal and classroom programs; and

HOUSE BILL 1626 9
(iv) Arrange for interaction between students and farmers through
promotional activities that may include field trips to farms and in–school presentations by
farmers.
(e) On or before January 1 of each year, each local educational agency AND
SCHOOL participating in the Program shall report to the Department the types and
amounts of farm products purchased from farms in the State.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.